Alabama, session 2026rs, HB384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 2 of Act 99-219, 1999 Regular
Session (Acts 1999, p. 278), as amended by Act 2024-420, 2024
Regular Session, is amended to read as follows:
"Section 2. (a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this
section, in addition to all existing charges, fees, judgments,
and costs of court, the clerk, sheriff, or other appropriate
court official in the civil division of the district and
circuit courts of Tuscaloosa County shall assess a fee of
sixty dollars ($60) per document personally served by the
sheriff's office, or its designee. For purposes of this act,
the term "document" shall include multiple papers served on a
party or entity at one time.
(2) The process fee provided in this subsection shall
not apply to any civil documents issued specifically by the
circuit court or any mental health documents or orders issued
by the office of the judge of probate.
(b) The court official designated in Tuscaloosa County
by law for the respective courts shall collect the service of
Page 1

by law for the respective courts shall collect the service of
HB384 Enrolled
process fee designated in subsection (a). In the case of
documents issued through the circuit clerk's office, three
dollars ($3) of each fee shall be retained in the circuit
clerk's office and deposited in the Circuit Clerk's Fund for
operation of the circuit clerk's office. In the case of
documents issued by the office of the judge of probate, three
dollars ($3) of each fee shall be retained by the office of
the judge of probate and used for the operation of the office
of the judge of probate. The net balance of the fees collected
shall be distributed as provided herein: Fifty percent of the
net balance shall be distributed to the Sheriff's Law
Enforcement Fund and used for the operation of the sheriff's
office; the remaining fifty50 percent of the net balance shall
be distributed to the Solicitor's Fund of the District
Attorney and used for the operation of the office of the
district attorney.
(c) In the case of documents requested to be personally
served by the sheriff's office in a civil case from outside of
this Statestate, a fee of eighty-five dollars ($85) shall be
collected by the sheriff for each document. Fifty percent of
these funds shall be distributed to the Sheriff's Law
Enforcement Fund and used for operation of the sheriff's
office. The remaining fifty50 percent of the funds shall be
distributed to the Solicitor's Fund of the District Attorney
and used for the operation of the office of the district
attorney."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
HB384 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 12-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 17-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3